Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.1961

Cheating in the first degree.

(1) A person is guilty of cheating in the first degree if he or she engages in cheating and:

(a) Knowingly causes, aids, abets, or conspires with another to engage in cheating; or

(b) Holds a license or similar permit issued by the state of Washington to conduct, manage, or act as an employee in an authorized gambling activity.

(2) Cheating in the first degree is a class C felony subject to the penalty set forth in RCW 9A.20.021. In addition to any other penalties imposed by law for a conviction of a violation of this section the court may impose an additional penalty of up to twenty thousand dollars on adult offenders.

[ 2015 c 265 s 12; 2002 c 253 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2015 c 265: See note following RCW 13.50.010.